Maryland, session 2026, HB1309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Commission to Review and Assess Racial Disparities in the State
Criminal Justice System.
(b) The Commission consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the Public Defender of Maryland, or the Public Defender’s designee;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1309*

HOUSE BILL 1309
(4) the Attorney General, or the Attorney General’s designee;
(5) one representative of the Administrative Office of the Courts, appointed
by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Maryland;
(6) the President of the Maryland State’s Attorneys’ Association, or the
President’s designee;
(7) the Executive Director of the Maryland State Commission on Criminal
Sentencing Policy, or the Executive Director’s designee;
(8) four members of the public with a demonstrated interest and experience
in advocating for improvements to the State’s criminal justice system, with two members
appointed by the President of the Senate and two members appointed by the Speaker of the
House; and
(9) the following members appointed by the Governor:
(i) one representative of a nonprofit entity whose work involves
justice reform, such as the Vera Institute of Justice; and
(ii) one representative of a crime victims’ advocacy group.
(c) (1) The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House shall each
designate one cochair of the Commission.
(2) The cochairs designated under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
each have experience:
(i) practicing criminal law in both a prosecutorial and defense
capacity;
(ii) in judicial and administrative matters; and
(iii) in data–driven criminal justice research in an academic or
nonprofit context.
(d) (1) The Department of Legislative Services, with assistance from an
academic institution such as the University of Maryland or Morgan State University, shall
provide staff for the Commission.
(2) To the extent practicable, the staff provided under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall have experience in data–driven criminal law research and expertise in
criminal justice reform and other areas relevant to the work of the Commission.
(e) A member of the Commission:

HOUSE BILL 1309 3
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) (1) The Commission shall study and make recommendations on:
(i) the disparate treatment of African Americans, Hispanics, and
other non–White individuals in the State’s criminal justice system, including:
1. how cumulative impacts may result from disparate
policing, arrests, charging, pretrial detention, sentencing, community supervision, and
prosecution, including diversion and plea policies; and
2. the impacts of disparate mandatory minimum sentencing,
including for convictions for:
A. offenses involving firearms; and
B. individuals who are not alleged to be principals in the first
degree;
(ii) the need and alternative methods available to improve any racial
disparities and lack of transparency in the State’s criminal justice system;
(iii) improvements available to the systemic structures for
race–neutral risk and needs assessments diversion, sentencing alternatives, rehabilitative
sentencing, and reduction of recidivism;
(iv) the possibility of using resources of the Division of Parole and
Probation in the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services to conduct pretrial
and presentence race–neutral risk and needs assessments that could be considered by
parties at the time of plea discussions and by judges at the time of sentencing;
(v) the potential to increase judicial discretion at sentencing to allow
judges to more closely consider as sentencing factors, including for individuals charged with
or convicted of crimes of violence or sex offenses:
1. the intent of the individuals being sentenced; and
2. the possibility for rehabilitation and reduction in
recidivism;
(vi) the possibility of modifying or abolishing the State’s felony
murder doctrine for cases for individuals who are not alleged to be principals in the first
degree;

HOUSE BILL 1309
(vii) the design and expansion of programs intended to:
1. reduce State prison populations;
2. be rehabilitative; and
3. further reduce the length of prison sentences in a manner
that is consistent with public safety; and
(viii) data collection methods for the ongoing monitoring of racial
disparities at each stage of the State’s criminal justice system, including identifying gaps
in existing data.
(2) The Commission shall:
(i) meet on or before September 16, 2026, and continue to meet at
least quarterly thereafter until submission of the final report required under subsection (g)
of this section; and
(ii) hold at least four public hearings to examine, discuss, and review
the items described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(g) (1) On or before October 1, 2027, the Commission shall submit an interim
report of its findings and recommendations to the Senate Judicial Proceedings Committee
and the House Judiciary Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article.
(2) On or before September 1, 2028, the Commission shall submit a final
report of its findings and recommendations to the Senate Judicial Proceedings Committee
and the House Judiciary Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2029,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.